Illinois, session 104th, HB1151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grocery Initiative Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 750/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:8    "Cooperative" means an organization that is organized 9according to the Co-operative Act. 10    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 11Opportunity.12    "Food desert" means a census tract that:13        (1) meets one of the following poverty standards:14            (A) the census tract has a poverty rate of at least 15        20%; or16            (B) the census tract is not located within a 17        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 18        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the 19        statewide median household income; or20            (C) the census tract is located within a 21        metropolitan statistical area and has a median family 22        income that is less than or equal to 80% of the greater 23        of (i) the statewide median household income or (ii)   HB1151- 2 -LRB104 06356 SPS 16392 b1        the metropolitan area median family income; and2        (2) meets one of the following population density and 3    food accessibility standards:4            (A) the census tract is a rural tract, and at least 5        33% of the population of the tract or at least 500 6        residents in the tract reside more than 10 miles from 7        the nearest grocery store; or8            (B) the census tract is an urban tract, and at 9        least 33% of the population of the tract or at least 10        500 residents in the tract reside more than one-half 11        mile from the nearest grocery store.12    The Department may also designate an area that does not 13meet the standards set forth in this definition as a food 14desert if the designation is made in accordance with criteria 15established by the Department by rule using data that 16includes, but is not limited to, poverty metrics and access to 17existing grocery stores.18    "Grocery store" means an existing or planned retail 19establishment or a mobile grocer that: (1) has or will have a 20primary business of selling a variety of grocery products, 21including fresh produce; (2) derives or will derive no more 22than 30% of its revenue from sales of tobacco and alcohol in 23any given year; (3) is or will be classified as a supermarket 24or other grocery retailer in the 2022 North American Industry 25Classification System under code 445110; (4) accepts or will 26accept Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and   HB1151- 3 -LRB104 06356 SPS 16392 b1Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and 2Children benefits; and (5) provides or will provide for the 3retail sale of a substantial variety of perishable foods, 4including fresh or frozen dairy products, fresh produce, and 5fresh meats, poultry, and fish. 6    "Local governmental unit" means any county, municipality, 7township, special district, or unit that is designated as a 8unit of local government by law and exercises limited 9governmental powers or powers in respect to limited 10governmental subjects. "Local governmental unit" also includes 11any school district or community college district.12    "Not-for-profit corporation" means an organization or 13institution that is organized and conducted on a 14not-for-profit basis with no personal profit inuring to anyone 15as a result of the operation and that is organized according to 16the General Not For Profit Corporation Act of 1986.17    "Rural tract" means a census tract that is not an urban 18tract.19    "Urban tract" means a census tract having its geographic 20centroid in an urban area, as defined by the Bureau of the 21Census for the most recent year in which all relevant data to 22identify food deserts is available.23(Source: P.A. 103-561, eff. 1-1-24.)